District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-205.46

Meal standard.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 546, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(nn), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.46.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(nn) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-205.44.